New York, session 2025-2026, A7128.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 2 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 13 of 2 section 189 of the general municipal law, as amended by section 11 of 3 part MM of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (2) is located in the county in which the municipality issuing the 6 raffle license is located or in a county that is contiguous to the coun- 7 ty in which the municipality issuing the raffle license is located 8 except that for the purposes of raffle tickets sold over the internet 9 the sale of such tickets shall be deemed to have occurred on the prem- 10 ises of the authorized organization or authorized games of chance 11 lessor; 12 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 190-a of the general municipal law, as 13 added by chapter 400 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 14 4. No raffle shall be conducted pursuant to this section except within 15 a municipality in which the authorized organization is domiciled that 16 has passed a local law, ordinance or resolution in accordance with 17 sections one hundred eighty-seven and one hundred eighty-eight of this 18 article approving the conduct of games of chance, and in municipalities 19 which have passed a local law, ordinance or resolution in accordance 20 with sections one hundred eighty-seven and one hundred eighty-eight of 21 this article approving the conduct of games of chance that are located 22 within the county or contiguous to the county in which the organization 23 is domiciled. For the purposes of raffle tickets sold over the internet 24 the sale of such tickets shall be deemed to have occurred on the prem- 25 ises of the authorized organization or authorized games of chance 26 lessor. 27 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02557-01-5